de: Typ des Motorriemens: Flachriemen; Rillenriemen; Keilrippenriemen (Poly-V); Rippenriemen; Zahnriemen; Keilriemen; Sonstige
pt-PT: tipo de correia do motor: Plana; Ranhurada; Poly-V; Com nervuras; Distribuição (dentada); Em V; Outro
da: Motorremtype: Flad; Rillet; Poly-V; Ribbet; Tandrem; Kilerem; Andet
fr: Type de courroie du moteur: Plate; Rainurée; Poly-V; Nervurée; De distribution (crantée); Trapézoïdale; Autre
ro-RO: Tipul curelei motorului: Plată; Canelată; Poly-V; Striată; De distribuție (dințată); V; Altele
ja: モーターベルトタイプ: フラット; グルーブド; ポリV; リブ; タイミング (歯付き); Vベルト; その他
el: Τύπος ιμάντα κινητήρα: Επίπεδος; Αυλακωτός; Poly-V; Με ραβδώσεις; Χρονισμού (οδοντωτός); V; Άλλο
sl-SI: Vrsta pogonskega jermena motorja: Ploščat; Utorni; Poly-V; Rebrast; Zobati; Klinasti; Drugo
zh-TW: 馬達皮帶類型: 平皮帶; 溝槽皮帶; 多楔皮帶 (Poly-V); 肋條皮帶; 正時 (齒形) 皮帶; V 型皮帶; 其他
sv: Motorremtyp: Platt; Spårad; Poly-V; Räfflad; Kugg; Kil; Annan
lt-LT: Variklio diržo tipas: Plokščiasis; Su grioveliais; „Poly-V“ formos; Rumbuotasis; Paskirstymo (dantytasis); V formos; Kita
nl: Motorriem type: Plat; Gegroefd; Poly-V; Geribbeld; Distributie (getand); V; Overig
tr: Motor kayışı tipi: Düz; Oluklu; Poly-V; Kanallı; Triger (dişli); V; Diğer
sk-SK: Typ remeňa motora: Plochý; Drážkovaný; Poly-V; Rebrovaný; Rozvodový (ozubený); Klinový; Iné
vi: Loại dây đai động cơ: Phẳng; Có rãnh; Poly-V; Có gân; Dây curoa cam (có răng); Chữ V; Khác
pt-BR: Correia do motor tipo: Plana; Com ranhuras; Poly-V; Estriada; Sincronizadora (dentada); Em V; Outro
en: Motor belt type: Flat; Grooved; Poly-V; Ribbed; Timing (toothed); V; Other
nb: Motorbeltetype: Flat; Rillet; Poly-V; Ribbet; Tannreim; Kilerem; Annet
hu: Motorszíj típusa: Laposszíj; Hornyolt; Hosszbordás (Poly-V); Bordás; Fogasszíj (vezérműszíj); Ékszíj; Egyéb
ko: 모터 벨트 유형: 평형; 홈; 폴리 V; 리브드; 타이밍(톱니); V형; 기타
zh-CN: 电机皮带类型: 平型; 槽型; 多楔带; 罗纹形; 正时（齿形）; V 型; 其他
fi: Moottorin hihnan tyyppi: Litteä; Uritettu; Moniurahihna; Uurrettu; Jakohihna (hammastettu); Kiilahihna; Muu
cs: Typ řemene motoru: Plochý; Drážkovaný; Vícedrážkový (Poly-V); Žebrovaný; Rozvodový (ozubený); Klínový; Jiné
it: Tipo di cinghia del motore: Piatta; Scanalata; Poly-V; Nervata; Di distribuzione (dentata); A V; Altro
hr-HR: Vrsta motornog remena: Plosnato; Kanalno; Poly-V; Rebrasto; Zupčasto; Klinasto; Ostalo
pl: Typ paska silnika: Płaski; Rowkowany; Wielorowkowy (Poly-V); Żebrowany; Rozrządu (Zębaty); Klinowy (V); Inny
th: ประเภทสายพานมอเตอร์: สายพานแบน; สายพานร่อง; สายพาน Poly-V; สายพานร่องซี่; สายพานไทม์มิ่ง (แบบฟันเฟือง); สายพาน V; อื่นๆ
es: Tipo de correa del motor: Plana; Acanalada; Poly-V; Estriada; De distribución (dentada); En V; Otro
bg-BG: Тип ремък на мотора: Плосък; С канали; Poly-V; Оребрен; Ангренажен (назъбен); Клиновиден; Друго
ru: Тип приводного ремня двигателя: Плоский; Желобчатый; Поликлиновой; Ребристый; Зубчатый (ГРМ); Клиновой; Другое